Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-222
Municipality; terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 3-221 to 3-232 only, unless another intention clearly appears or the context otherwise requires, this state shall be included in the term municipality, and all the powers conferred upon municipalities in the Revised Airports Act and section 18-1502, if not otherwise conferred by law, are hereby conferred upon this state when acting jointly with any municipality or municipalities. Where reference is made to the governing body of a municipality, that term shall mean, as to the state, the Division of Aeronautics of the Department of Transportation.

Laws 1945, c. 34, § 11(2), p. 165;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 59.

State of Nebraska and municipality may act jointly in acquiring airport. Spencer v. Village of Wallace, 153 Neb. 536, 45 N.W.2d 473 (1951).